Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-704
Annual appropriation bill; contents.

Each city of the first class shall adopt a budget statement pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act, to be termed "The Annual Appropriation Bill", in which the city may appropriate such sums of money as may be deemed necessary to defray all necessary expenses and liabilities of such city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 41, p. 242;

R.S.1913, § 4974;

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 257;

C.S.1922, § 4143;

Laws 1925, c. 37, § 2, p. 146;

C.S.1929, § 16-703;

R.S.1943, § 16-704;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 174.
July 21, 2016
Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.

Levy of taxes should be certified to the county clerk for levy by the county. McDonald v. Lincoln County, 141 Neb. 741, 4 N.W.2d 903 (1942).

The term "government" as used in the Constitution in relation to law governing cities of the first class is not limited to the administration of laws or regulation, but includes all activities engaged in lawfully by such city. Mutual Oil Co. v. Zehrung, 11 F.2d 887 (D. Neb. 1925).